src/dictionaries/lv_LV.aff
SFX h Y 161
SFX h   t   oğa      [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oğâ      [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oğai     [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oğais    [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oğajâ    [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oğajai   [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oğajam   [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oğajâm   [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oğajâs   [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oğajiem  [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oğajos   [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oğam     [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oğâm     [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oğas     [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oğâs     [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oği      [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oğie     [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oğiem    [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oğo      [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oğos     [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oğs      [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oğu      [^âçî]t
SFX h   t   oğus     [^âçî]t
SFX h   çt   oğa      [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oğâ      [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oğai     [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oğais    [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oğajâ    [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oğajai   [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oğajam   [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oğajâm   [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oğajâs   [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oğajiem  [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oğajos   [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oğam     [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oğâm     [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oğas     [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oğâs     [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oği      [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oğie     [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oğiem    [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oğo      [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oğos     [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oğs      [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oğu      [ç]t
SFX h   çt   oğus     [ç]t
SFX h   ît   oğa      [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oğâ      [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oğai     [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oğais    [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oğajâ    [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oğajai   [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oğajam   [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oğajâm   [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oğajâs   [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oğajiem  [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oğajos   [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oğam     [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oğâm     [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oğas     [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oğâs     [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oği      [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oğie     [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oğiem    [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oğo      [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oğos     [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oğs      [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oğu      [^cz][î]t
SFX h   ît   oğus     [^cz][î]t
SFX h   cît  koğa      [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koğâ      [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koğai     [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koğais    [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koğajâ    [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koğajai   [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koğajam   [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koğajâm   [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koğajâs   [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koğajiem  [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koğajos   [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koğam     [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koğâm     [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koğas     [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koğâs     [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koği      [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koğie     [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koğiem    [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koğo      [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koğos     [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koğs      [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koğu      [c]ît
SFX h   cît  koğus     [c]ît
SFX h   ît   oğa      [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oğâ      [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oğai     [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oğais    [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oğajâ    [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oğajai   [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oğajam   [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oğajâm   [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oğajâs   [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oğajiem  [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oğajos   [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oğam     [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oğâm     [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oğas     [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oğâs     [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oği      [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oğie     [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oğiem    [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oğo      [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oğos     [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oğs      [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oğu      [^d]zît
SFX h   ît   oğus     [^d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goğa      [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goğâ      [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goğai     [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goğais    [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goğajâ    [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goğajai   [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goğajam   [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goğajâm   [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goğajâs   [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goğajiem  [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goğajos   [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goğam     [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goğâm     [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goğas     [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goğâs     [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goği      [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goğie     [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goğiem    [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goğo      [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goğos     [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goğs      [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goğu      [d]zît
SFX h   dzît  goğus     [d]zît
SFX h   ât   oğa      [â]t
SFX h   ât   oğâ      [â]t
SFX h   ât   oğai     [â]t
SFX h   ât   oğais    [â]t
SFX h   ât   oğajâ    [â]t
SFX h   ât   oğajai   [â]t
SFX h   ât   oğajam   [â]t
SFX h   ât   oğajâm   [â]t
SFX h   ât   oğajâs   [â]t
SFX h   ât   oğajiem  [â]t
SFX h   ât   oğajos   [â]t
SFX h   ât   oğam     [â]t
SFX h   ât   oğâm     [â]t
SFX h   ât   oğas     [â]t
SFX h   ât   oğâs     [â]t
SFX h   ât   oği      [â]t
SFX h   ât   oğie     [â]t
SFX h   ât   oğiem    [â]t
SFX h   ât   oğo      [â]t
SFX h   ât   oğos     [â]t
SFX h   ât   oğs      [â]t
SFX h   ât   oğu      [â]t
SFX h   ât   oğus     [â]t
