src/dictionaries/lv_LV.dic
aizbikstīt/+M(BIb1[hJC
aizdedzināt/+[b(IMdJhg1BcC
aizdurt/+h6BI(M5J
aizgludināt/[bI+g(BhJcd1MC
aizkarināt/+(1gIcbJ[hdBCM
aizkurt/+h5J[(BI6M
aizlidināt/b(c+dghBIJ1CM
aizmiegt/+%(8haIB5JM6
aizpildīt/+hbJ[I(1BMC
aizpostīt/b+(MhI1JBC
aizrādīt/b+(hJBI1MC
aizskanēt/+JCIb(Bh1M
aizsmidzināt/+IbgB(c1dhMCJ
aizspert/IB6[J+h5(Md
aizstādīt/+hc[bIJdBgCM(1
aiztecināt/+bhg(cBI[C1JdM
aizvedāt/+hC
aizzuzēt/+hJ(CMIBb1
aizšvirkstināt/JC+hdIcB(g1bM
aizņurdēt/+hb(BIJC1M
apbraukt/IB6ah+45%MJ
apdarīt/B+bI1Jh[(M4C
apdrupināt/+hcJI[(dMgCbB1
apdzisināt/+JhdcB(I1gCbM
apgrabināt/h+Ib(Mc[JBdg1C
apgumdīt/+[h(bIC1d
apkaisīt/MbI+[h(gdB1JcC
apklaudzināt/M+cIbd(gh[CJB1
apkurināt/+(bhCcI[JgMdB1
aplaupīt/b(+hBIMJ1C
apluncināt/+(dgcJbI[hC1BM
apmierināt/[hI+C1gb(dBcMJ
apmīlēt/+bIMJ1Bh(C
applandēt/+(IBbh1CMJ
applātīt/(+JCBbIhM1
apraidīt/b+(JMhBI[1C
aprukšķēt/C+IJBh(1Mb
apskaitīt/(+hJM1IBb[C
apslacināt/+bJ(gIBhM1cCd[
apsmaidīt/+IJ(MbhB1C
apsolīt/Bd+hIbc1gMJ([C
apstaipīt/hBdc(I1+gM[bJC
apsusināt/+Ib(c[1gBdJhMC
apsārtināt/+bhdBI1(cJMgC
aptekalēt/h+BI)bJM1
aptvert/+d(Mh6BI[J5
apvedināt/+bJ([BdIchCMg1
apvēkšķēt/+IMh(bCB1J
apčabināt/+b[BdcCIhg(1JM
apķircināt/+dhbgJIC(cM1B
apšķetināt/cdI+b(JhgB1MC
apņirbēt/+bJ(Ih1BCM
art/he+dJMBI([6}4
atbikstīt/+(J[BI1ghdbcMC
atbēgt/+BaIJ(h8M4
atdienēt/bghB+(J1MIc[dC
atdurt/+^Jh5I(MdB6
atdārdināt/+bg(BIhcdCJM1
atgrabināt/dI(BhcC+[bgJM1
atirdināt/+chMI1g(dBJbC[
atkasīt/bg+I(chBdC1[MJ
atklaudzēt/b[J+BI1(hCM
atknikšķināt/+[hbdgcC(IBMJ1
atkurkšķēt/h+C(IBbJ1M
atliedināt/+JBdIM(1gcbhC
atmetināt/J+dMB(I1gcb[hC
atmānīt/+bcdgJhBI(1CM
atplaiksnīt/+Igcbh(1BJd[MC
atplūdināt/+hcgIdC(BbJ1M
atraisīt/h(+Ig1dBMb[cJC
atrēķināt/Md+BI(bhcCg[J1
atskaitīt/+gI(J[hbcdMB1C
atslidināt/+ghdbI(CcB[M1J
atspaidīt/(+MbhIJB1C
atspārdīt/M+h(IB1Jb[C
atsumināt/gJh+(bBI1McdC
attaisīt/h+b(Ig1dBCM[cJ
attilināt/h+Ig1(dBbMcCJ
aturkšķēt/C+bhJBM(I[1
atvaļināt/+b([gIBchdM1JC
atvirzīt/I+MhJc(Bbg1d[C
atzibēt/(+hMbBIC[J1
atčaukstināt/+dBh(gbIJcMC1
atķept/I+heJ(BM48
atšķetināt/c+JdIbhM(gB1C
atņaudēt/[+(JhIbB1CM
atžvadzēt/+1BIbCh(JM[
balināt/I+Mg1(cCbJB[dh
bildināt/cMhC+b[BI(dg1J
bubināt/+MI1g(Jchb[BdC
caurredzēt/+bhJ10B(CM
cīnīt/BI(+cgJbh[d1MC
dedzināt/I+Jc[dBg1(hMbC
draudēt/(+bhCcIBdJgM1
durt/+h(^[5IJMBd6
dzirdināt/hCc[J+gI(Bd1bM
gaidīt/Bd+gI1M(bcJhC
gorīt/+hBI(db[1gMcCJ
gruzdēt/c+BIbgJCh(1dM
ieadīt/+MIbBh(1JC
iebiedināt/+hJCcI(BbM1dg
iebēgt/J(hIa+BM48
iedauzīt/(b[d+cg1BIhJMC
iedrošināt/+(g1IbJc[hdMBC
iedziedāt/h+b[JIB1gdM
ieelpināt/bC+Jh1(IBM
iegrozīt/g[h+c(bIM1BdJC
iejādināt/+JhI(BcCbg[1dM
ieklabēt/+gbIBhJd(1Cc[M
ieknakšķēt/c+(JdIgbCh[1BM
iekurināt/h+JIc(Cbd1gBM
iekņudināt/d+bI(BhcC1gJM
ielidināt/+dJcCbhgI[(1BM
iemiegt/%(+dBJIa86hM5
iemurmināt/+gh(IbJdMcB1C
ieniezēt/(+bdchI[gJM
iepilināt/hb+cdBI(1CJMg
ieplūdināt/+gBIb(dhJc1MC
ieraugāt/+(hC
ierušināt/+c(BdI1gMJbCh[
iesitāt/C+h
ieslacīt/+bIMh(JBdg14
iesmirdināt/+[(1IBcdMhgbCJ
iespraudīt/+b(JhIM1
iestaipīt/+1BI(ghcbJdMC
iesvilināt/+JdB(MI1bhgcC
iesūrstēt/+Idhb(gJc[M
ietipināt/+IJchg(Bb1CdM
ietrūdēt/+bhJBIC(M1
ievalstīt/+dIc(MJg1BhbC
ievilcināt/h+bBIg(1dJcCM
ievēlēt/$H+b(IcG)g1B[hJCdM
ieēdāt/h+C
ieīdēt/+bMJc([hgBI1Cd
iešķindēt/+(1BIbh[MJC
ieņirbēt/+b[hI1JB(CM
irt/heJ+dI^MZ[(B746}
izbalināt/+(IBhCcJ1bd[Mg
izbrīnīt/+)chd(IGbB1gCH[$MJ
izcīnīt/+(BIbgcJ[hCMd1
izdienēt/b+J[BgIh(1dcMC
izdusēt/+(dMhb[cJIgB1C
izdēdēt/1BI+b(hCMJ
izgraizīt/+bdg(hcJCBI1M
izgānīt/+(bIcJgB[hCM1d
izkarināt/+hIdbg(BcJ[M1C
izklaudzināt/+(IbdMgchB[J1C
izknakšķināt/bh+BIg(cd[JCM1
izkūpēt/M+(bBI1ChJ
izlādēt/+(dB$HbIc)h[J1gCM{G
izmīdīt/+(dbghIJ[BC1cM
izplaukšķināt/M+BI1(hdgbJc[C
izpīkstināt/b+MJhdcIB1(Cg
izrībēt/+Ih(b[BCM1J
izslaukt/h%aI+B6M45J
izsprakšķēt/+(hIJbCB1M
izsusināt/gb+(hcI1MBdCJ
iztecēt/h1BIdgb+JM
iztvarstīt/[+JbBChMI(1
izvijāt/h+
izzināt/+JdB[b(gIchC1M
izķircināt/+bgJ(hdICcBM1
izņurdēt/+h(b[MCBIJ1
klabināt/[(+cbdghJICMB1
knakšķēt/c+MBI1h(dgCbJ[
kurkšķēt/+dhI1Bc(bCgJM
laistīt/+hcIB([Jgbd1MC
lādēt/$+{BIG)(cbCJM[hgHd1
minēt/B+hIJb(Mdg1c[C
mēdīt/BI+b(1hgc[JdMC
nobaudīt/c+gdh(J1BIbCM
nobēgt/+hJ(IaB84M
nodimdēt/+1IB(hbJCM[
nodziedāt/+bJ1gIdBhM[
nograbināt/h+[Jbg(BI1cCdM
nojādināt/+bI(BhcCd1gJM
noklaušināt/J+h(BdcIMbg[C1
nokraukšķināt/+JdhIb(gcBCM1
nolaistīt/+hBdbJ[c(gMI1C
nomaldināt/b+dBIchMJC(g1
nomīdīt/+hIB1(b[gJCcdM
noplosīt/J+[bhcIB(dgM1C
noraisīt/+[ch(JIMbgBd1C
nosacīt/+IbdB(ghJM1
noskūpstīt/bh+[Ic(Bd1gMJC
nosmirdināt/+(cChdB[JIbM1g
nosprindzināt/J[h+b(dMgcCBI1
nostādīt/+bhdIJ(cg[4B1MC
notarkšķināt/(1gI+bdBhcJ[CM
notrulināt/[bg(BI+h1JcdCM
novadīt/hbI+cgd(JM1B[C
novirzīt/+Ibg(cJMBh[d1C
nozvanīt/h(J+cI[dBbMg1C
noķepināt/+hI[JcgdB1(bCM
nošķetināt/cdI+J[b(gBChM1
nožvadzināt/+(gbIBchdMJC1[
pabalsināt/(Mb+Bd1gIchJ[C
paburt/+J[M5IB(dh6
padedzināt/J+gh[d(bMIBc1C
padziedināt/g+hMbIcC(dBJ[1
pagludināt/+hdb(IJgBcC1[M
pagumzīt/+gcIbh(1BdJMC[
pakladzināt/+1gJIhbdM(Bc[C
paknubināt/hJg+bd[BI(c1CM
pakutināt/+c(dCIh[BbJgM1
palecināt/+IBdgCbc(hJ[M1
palīdzēt/1BI+gcJb([hCdM
pamusināt/+IBc(bhCd[JgM1
papilināt/(+hdIcBCbJg[M1
papriecināt/JIM+dhb(cg[CB1
parisināt/+BIdchC(bJ[gM1
pasisināt/+BI(dbhcCgJ[M1
paslidināt/+gJIbhBdc(C1M[
pasolīt/b+h(c[gIdMB1JC
pastaipīt/h+(Igb[1cdBJCM
pasvinēt/+(IbBhJM[1C
patecēt/I+Bhgb1Jd[M
patrupēt/+BIhbJ(1MC
pavaibstīt/hc[+dBMI1g(bJC
pavirināt/IcB1(hb+d[MgJC
pazvanīt/b+c([dBI1ghMJC
pačīkstināt/bhd+[cIB1(JgCM
pašķindēt/1BIb+(h[JCM
peldināt/c+BdhI1g([bJCM
piededzināt/dg+IbhJ[(1BcMC
pieglaudīt/+JcIbhd([gM1
pieklusināt/IJ+db[cMgB(hC1
pieliekt/h+M(%daJ}IB[568
pienākt/(+}[JadIhB8M5
pieradināt/(+bhgBI1dJCc[M
piesisināt/+bh[dJC(gcIM1B
piesmirdēt/+bIB(hC[J1M
piesālīt/1g(+IdB[cJhbMC
pievadīt/+I[Jcbh(Bg1MdC
piešaudīt/+g1cI[BC(dJbhM
placināt/[+JcI(bghd1CBM
pratināt/+d(CcBhIg1J[bM
pārbalināt/I1g(h+cJ[BbdCM
pārcildināt/+gb(hIBd1CcJ[M
pārdzert/+hI(B6dJ5M[
pārgrabēt/M+h(bIBC[J1
pārklabināt/+IbBd(1gCh[JcM
pārkurināt/+Icgb(BM1hdC[J
pārliedināt/+b1(BIhg[cJMCd
pārmīkstināt/+hMcJbg(1IBdC[
pārpratināt/+IB(bgMhcJd[C1
pārsaistīt/+IchBdgM(b1[JC
pārslavināt/+bIh[(1gBdJcCM
pārspridzināt/+g(c[bIJMdBhC1
pārsvaidīt/+1IB(g[bMdchJC
pārtraipīt/+JMhb(I1BC[
pārvidžināt/hI+JcCB(d1g[Mb
pārēdāt/h+C
pārņemt/+MIB(hd[J
reibināt/gCcJ+Idh(bBM1[
rīdīt/BI(+gJd1bcChM
sablīkšķēt/b+hJ(IB1CM
sadarināt/h+(IB1JbMC
sadzert/hIJ+M(B[6d5
sagrabēt/I+Bh(1bMCJ
sajūsmināt/+c[gbIJ(1BdhMC
saklaudzēt/+CbI[J(hB1M
sakraukšķināt/+gcIJhd(1bB[MC
sakūdīt/bgBC+M(Ich[Jd1
salipināt/+(1IBgbdh[JcCM
samijāt/+h
sanest/8+(IeJhF}M4[
saplosīt/+hIb(dc[M1gBJC
saraidīt/hIdc+J(bMgB1[C
sarīdīt/+c(bg[IdB1JhCM
saskumdināt/+MCcJ(bhdBgI[1
sasmidzināt/dB+hb[(I1gJcMC
sastaipīt/(hIgbc[+JdCBM1
sasvārstīt/+bc(hdIBgMC[1J
satrallināt/h+IMB1(bcJdg[C
sausināt/cC(1gh+MBI[Jbd
savizināt/Ic+h[bBg(CMJ1d
saēdāt/h+C
sašvīkstināt/h+cIb(JgdC[MB1
saņemt/J+dI([BhM
skatīt/+bghJ[(BI1cdMC
slīdēt/+MIbJcdB1h(gC
spindzēt/b+dcIJg[Bh(CM1
steidzināt/+IcbJdhg[M(1BC
sust/BJh8I+(Nd
tapināt/+J[hd(bcMIBgC1
trallināt/d+[Jb(hIcB1CgM
tvanēt/c+dJI1gbMB(hC
uzbikstīt/+hJM(Ig[bdcB1C
uzcept/+MIB8eh(dJ[}4
uzdzirdēt/b+JB01(hCM
uzkabināt/+(IBdh1gbcJ[CM
uzknibināt/+c(1gIJ[bdhBCM
uzkvēpināt/+bdhMI(1gBc[CJ
uzlādēt/$H+)[d{J(h1BIGgCMb
uznākt/(+aM[8BIhJ}5
uzprasīt/+hcgbBCI(dJM[1
uzrībēt/h(+IbBMC1J
uzslavināt/gbhI(BcC+d[J1M
uzspirdzināt/b+1g(IhdBcCJM[
uzstumdīt/b+BI1(hgCd[JMc
uztaustīt/bIchCBdJ+(g[M1
uzurkšķēt/Ch+JbI(B1M
uzvizēt/)+g$bCd[JI(GhBMH1
uzčubināt/b+BdCchI[g(MJ1
uzšķindēt/1BIb+(hJMC
vaidēt/+JcCMbdIB(hg1[
vijāt/+h
vēlēt/$+BI(cGb)hJ1M[gHdC
ēdāt/h+C
ļumt/eIh+(Z^MJ87B4
šļakstināt/+hdcBI1(gbJM[C
